Maryland, session 2025, HB0785.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–6B–22.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(3) “FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(4) “LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION THAT IS RESTRICTED FOR OCCUPANCY TO INDIVIDUALS OVER A
SPECIFIED AGE.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTIONS (D) THROUGH (F)
OF THIS SECTION, A PROVISION IN THE ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR A
PROPRIETARY LEASE OR A PROVISION OF THE BYLAWS OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION MAY NOT PROHIBIT OR RESTRICT:
(I) THE ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF A FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME; OR
(II) THE USE OF THE ROADS, SIDEWALKS, AND OTHER COMMON
ELEMENTS OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION BY USERS OF THE
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 375
(2) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION, THE OPERATION OF A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME SHALL BE:
(I) CONSIDERED A RESIDENTIAL ACTIVITY; AND
(II) A PERMITTED ACTIVITY.
(3) A PROVISION IN THE ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR A
PROPRIETARY LEASE OR A PROVISION OF THE BYLAWS OF A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION MAY NOT LIMIT THE NUMBER OF CHILDREN FOR WHICH A FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME PROVIDES FAMILY CHILD
CARE TO BELOW THE NUMBER AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION.
(D) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY INCLUDE IN THE
ARTICLES OF INCORPORATION OR A PROPRIETARY LEASE OR THE BYLAWS A
PROVISION THAT:
(1) REQUIRES FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDERS TO PAY ON A PRO
RATA BASIS BASED ON THE TOTAL NUMBER OF FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES OR
LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES OPERATING IN THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION ANY INCREASE IN INSURANCE COSTS OF THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION THAT ARE SOLELY AND DIRECTLY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
OPERATION OF FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES
IN THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION; AND
(2) IMPOSES A FEE FOR USE OF COMMON ELEMENTS IN A
REASONABLE AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED $50 PER YEAR ON EACH FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME THAT IS REGISTERED AND OPERATING
IN THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(E) THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY REQUIRE RESIDENTS
TO NOTIFY THE COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION BEFORE OPENING A FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(F) (1) A FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER IN A COOPERATIVE HOUSING
CORPORATION:
(I) SHALL OBTAIN THE LIABILITY INSURANCE DESCRIBED
UNDER §§ 19–106 AND 19–203 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE IN AT LEAST THE
MINIMUM AMOUNTS DESCRIBED UNDER THOSE STATUTES; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 375 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) MAY NOT OPERATE WITHOUT THE LIABILITY INSURANCE
DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH.
(2) A COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION MAY NOT REQUIRE A
FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER TO OBTAIN INSURANCE IN AN AMOUNT GREATER
THAN THE MINIMUM AMOUNT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
Article – Education
9.5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Family child care home” means a residence in which family child care is
provided for up to eight children.
(f) “Family child care provider” means an individual who cares for children in a
registered family child care home or a registered large family child care home.
(g) “Large family child care home” means a residence in which family child care
is provided for at least nine children, but not more than 12 children.
Article – Land Use
1–401.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to charter
counties.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to a charter county:
(1) this subtitle, including Parts II and III (Charter county –
Comprehensive plans);
(2) § 1–101(l), (m), and (o) (Definitions – “Plan”, “Priority funding area”,
and “Sensitive area”);
(3) § 1–201 (Visions);
(4) § 1–206 (Required education);
(5) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(6) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 375
(7) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 5 (Growth Tiers);
(9) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(10) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(11) § 4–208 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(12) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(13) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(14) § 4–212 (Agritourism);
(15) § 4–213 (Alcohol production);
(16) § 4–214 (Agricultural alcohol production);
(17) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(18) § 4–216 (LIMITATIONS – FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES AND LARGE
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES);
(19) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(19)] (20) § 5–104 (Major subdivision – Review);
[(20)] (21) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(21)] (22) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(22)] (23) except in Montgomery County or Prince George’s County, Title
7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities Agreements);
[(23)] (24) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(24)] (25) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability);
[(25)] (26) § 8–401 (Conversion of overhead facilities);
[(26)] (27) for Baltimore County only, Title 9, Subtitle 3 (Single–County
Provisions – Baltimore County);
– 5 –

Ch. 375 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(27)] (28) for Frederick County only, Title 9, Subtitle 10 (Single–County
Provisions – Frederick County);
[(28)] (29) for Howard County only, Title 9, Subtitle 13 (Single–County
Provisions – Howard County);
[(29)] (30) for Talbot County only, Title 9, Subtitle 18 (Single–County
Provisions – Talbot County); and
[(30)] (31) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
(c) This section supersedes any inconsistent provision of Division II of this article.
4–216.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(3) “LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(B) A LOCAL JURISDICTION MAY NOT, BY LOCAL ORDINANCE, RESOLUTION,
LAW, OR RULE, LIMIT THE NUMBER OF CHILDREN FOR WHICH A FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME PROVIDES FAMILY CHILD CARE TO
BELOW THE NUMBER AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.
10–103.
(a) Except as provided in this section, this division does not apply to Baltimore
City.
(b) The following provisions of this division apply to Baltimore City:
(1) this title;
(2) § 1–101(m) (Definitions – “Priority funding area”);
(3) § 1–101(o) (Definitions – “Sensitive area”);
(4) § 1–201 (Visions);
(5) § 1–206 (Required education);
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 375
(6) § 1–207 (Annual report – In general);
(7) § 1–208 (Annual report – Measures and indicators);
(8) Title 1, Subtitle 3 (Consistency);
(9) Title 1, Subtitle 4, Parts II and III (Home Rule Counties –
Comprehensive Plans; Implementation);
(10) § 4–104(c) (Limitations – Bicycle parking);
(11) § 4–104(d) (Limitations – Manufactured homes and modular dwellings);
(12) § 4–205 (Administrative adjustments);
(13) § 4–207 (Exceptions – Maryland Accessibility Code);
(14) § 4–210 (Permits and variances – Solar panels);
(15) § 4–211 (Change in zoning classification – Energy generating systems);
(16) § 4–215 (Pollinator–friendly vegetation management);
(17) § 4–216 (LIMITATIONS – FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES AND LARGE
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES);
(18) § 5–102(d) (Subdivision regulations – Burial sites);
[(18)] (19) Title 7, Subtitle 1 (Development Mechanisms);
[(19)] (20) Title 7, Subtitle 2 (Transfer of Development Rights);
[(20)] (21) Title 7, Subtitle 3 (Development Rights and Responsibilities
Agreements);
[(21)] (22) Title 7, Subtitle 4 (Inclusionary Zoning);
[(22)] (23) Title 7, Subtitle 5 (Housing Expansion and Affordability); and
[(23)] (24) Title 11, Subtitle 2 (Civil Penalty).
Article – Real Property
11–111.1.
– 7 –

Ch. 375 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) [“Child care provider” means the adult who has primary responsibility
for the operation of a family child care home.
(3)] “Family child care home” [means a unit registered under Title 5,
Subtitle 5 of the Family Law] HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9.5–301 OF THE
EDUCATION Article.
(3) “FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(4) “LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
[(4)] (5) “No–impact home–based business” means a business that:
(i) Is consistent with the residential character of the dwelling unit;
(ii) Is subordinate to the use of the dwelling unit for residential
purposes and requires no external modifications that detract from the residential
appearance of the dwelling unit;
(iii) Uses no equipment or process that creates noise, vibration, glare,
fumes, odors, or electrical or electronic interference detectable by neighbors or that causes
an increase of common expenses that can be solely and directly attributable to a no–impact
home–based business; and
(iv) Does not involve use, storage, or disposal of any grouping or
classification of materials that the United States Secretary of Transportation or the State
or any local governing body designates as a hazardous material.
(b) [(1) The provisions of this section relating to family child care homes do not
apply to a condominium that is limited to housing for older persons, as defined under the
federal Fair Housing Act.
(2)] The provisions of this section relating to no–impact home–based
businesses do not apply to a condominium that [has]:
(1) HAS adopted, prior to July 1, 1999, procedures in accordance with its
covenants, declaration, or bylaws for the regulation or prohibition of no–impact
home–based businesses; OR
(2) IS RESTRICTED FOR OCCUPANCY TO INDIVIDUALS OVER A
SPECIFIED AGE.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 375
(c) (1) Subject to the provisions of [subsections] SUBSECTION (d) [and (e)(1)]
of this section, a recorded covenant or restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision
of the bylaws or rules of a condominium [that prohibits or restricts commercial or business
activity in general, but does not expressly apply to family child care homes or no–impact
home–based businesses, may not be construed to prohibit or restrict]:
(i) MAY NOT PROHIBIT OR RESTRICT:
1. The establishment and operation of family child care
homes or LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES; OR
2. THE USE OF THE ROADS, SIDEWALKS, AND OTHER
COMMON ELEMENTS OF THE CONDOMINIUM BY USERS OF THE FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME; AND
(II) IF THE RECORDED COVENANT OR RESTRICTION, PROVISION
IN A DECLARATION, OR PROVISION OF THE BYLAWS OR RULES OF A CONDOMINIUM
OTHERWISE PROHIBITS OR RESTRICTS COMMERCIAL OR BUSINESS ACTIVITY IN
GENERAL BUT DOES NOT EXPRESSLY APPLY TO NO–IMPACT HOME–BASED
BUSINESSES, MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT OR RESTRICT no–impact
home–based businesses[; or
(ii) Use of the roads, sidewalks, and other common elements of the
condominium by users of the family child care home].
(2) Subject to the provisions of [subsections] SUBSECTION (d) [and (e)(1)]
of this section, the operation of a family child care home, LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME, or no–impact home–based business shall be:
(i) Considered a residential activity; and
(ii) A permitted activity.
(3) A RECORDED COVENANT OR RESTRICTION, A PROVISION IN A
DECLARATION, OR A PROVISION OF THE BYLAWS OR RULES OF A CONDOMINIUM MAY
NOT LIMIT THE NUMBER OF CHILDREN FOR WHICH A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME OR
LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME PROVIDES FAMILY CHILD CARE TO BELOW THE
NUMBER AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION.
(d) (1) (i) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this
subsection, a condominium may include in its declaration, bylaws, or rules and restrictions
a provision expressly prohibiting the use of a unit as a [family child care home or]
no–impact home–based business.
– 9 –

Ch. 375 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) A provision described under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
expressly prohibiting the use of a unit as a [family child care home or] no–impact
home–based business shall apply to an existing [family child care home or] no–impact
home–based business in the condominium.
(2) A provision described under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection
expressly prohibiting the use of a unit as a [family child care home or] no–impact
home–based business may not be enforced unless it is approved by a simple majority of the
total eligible voters of the condominium under the voting procedures contained in the
declaration or bylaws of the condominium.
(3) If a condominium includes in its declaration, bylaws, or rules and
restrictions, a provision prohibiting the use of a unit as a [family child care home or]
no–impact home–based business, it shall also include a provision stating that the
prohibition may be eliminated and [family child care homes or] no–impact home–based
businesses may be approved by a simple majority of the total eligible voters of the
condominium under the voting procedures contained in the declaration or bylaws of the
condominium.
(4) If a condominium includes in its declaration, bylaws, or rules and
restrictions a provision expressly prohibiting the use of a unit as a [family child care home
or] no–impact home–based business, the prohibition may be eliminated and [family child
care or] no–impact home–based business activities may be permitted by the approval of a
simple majority of the total eligible voters of the condominium under the voting procedures
contained in the declaration or bylaws of the condominium.
(e) A condominium may include in its declaration, bylaws, or rules and
restrictions a provision that:
(1) [Regulates the number or percentage of family child care homes
operating in the condominium, provided that the percentage of family child care homes
permitted may not be less than 7.5 percent of the total units of the condominium;
(2)] Requires FAMILY child care providers to pay on a pro rata basis based
on the total number of family child care homes OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES
operating in the condominium any increase in insurance costs of the condominium that are
solely and directly attributable to the operation of family child care homes OR LARGE
FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES in the condominium; and
[(3)] (2) Imposes a fee for use of common elements in a reasonable
amount not to exceed $50 per year on each family child care home, LARGE FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME, or no–impact home–based business which is registered and operating in the
condominium.
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 375
(f) (1) [If the condominium regulates the number or percentage of family child
care homes under subsection (e)(1) of this section, in order to assure compliance with the
regulation, the] THE condominium may require residents to notify the condominium before
opening a family child care home OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(2) The condominium may require residents to notify the condominium
before opening a no–impact home–based business.
(g) (1) A FAMILY child care provider in a condominium:
(i) Shall obtain the liability insurance described under §§ 19–106
and 19–203 of the Insurance Article in at least the minimum amount described under that
statute; and
(ii) May not operate without the liability insurance described under
item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) A condominium may not require a FAMILY child care provider to obtain
insurance in an amount greater than the minimum amount required under paragraph (1)
of this subsection.
(h) A condominium may restrict or prohibit a no–impact home–based business in
any common elements.
(i) To the extent that this section is inconsistent with any other provision of this
title, this section shall take precedence over any inconsistent provision.
11B–111.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) [“Child care provider” means the adult who has primary responsibility
for the operation of a family child care home.
(3)] “Family child care home” [means a unit registered under Title 9.5,
Subtitle 3] HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9.5–301 of the Education Article.
(3) “FAMILY CHILD CARE PROVIDER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(4) “LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME” HAS THE MEANING STATED
IN § 9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
[(4)] (5) “No–impact home–based business” means a business that:
– 11 –

Ch. 375 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Is consistent with the residential character of the dwelling unit;
(ii) Is subordinate to the use of the dwelling unit for residential
purposes and requires no external modifications that detract from the residential
appearance of the dwelling unit;
(iii) Uses no equipment or process that creates noise, vibration, glare,
fumes, odors, or electrical or electronic interference detectable by neighbors or that causes
an increase of common expenses that can be solely and directly attributable to a no–impact
home–based business; and
(iv) Does not involve use, storage, or disposal of any grouping or
classification of materials that the United States Secretary of Transportation or the State
or any local governing body designates as a hazardous material.
(b) [(1) The provisions of this section relating to family child care homes do not
apply to a homeowners association that is limited to housing for older persons, as defined
under the federal Fair Housing Act.
(2)] The provisions of this section relating to no–impact home–based
businesses do not apply to a homeowners association that [has]:
(1) HAS adopted, prior to July 1, 1999, procedures in accordance with its
covenants, declaration, or bylaws for the prohibition or regulation of no–impact
home–based businesses; OR
(2) IS RESTRICTED FOR OCCUPANCY TO INDIVIDUALS OVER A
SPECIFIED AGE.
(c) (1) Subject to the provisions of [subsections] SUBSECTION (d) [and (e)(1)]
of this section, a recorded covenant or restriction, a provision in a declaration, or a provision
of the bylaws or rules of a homeowners association [that prohibits or restricts commercial
or business activity in general, but does not expressly apply to family child care homes or
no–impact home–based businesses, may not be construed to prohibit or restrict]:
(i) [The establishment] MAY NOT PROHIBIT OR RESTRICT THE:
1. ESTABLISHMENT and operation of family child care
homes or LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOMES; OR
2. USE OF THE ROADS, SIDEWALKS, AND OTHER
COMMON ELEMENTS OF THE HOMEOWNERS ASSOCIATION BY USERS OF THE FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME; AND
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 375
(II) IF THE RECORDED COVENANT OR RESTRICTION, PROVISION
IN A DECLARATION, OR PROVISION OF THE BYLAWS OR RULES OF A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION OTHERWISE PROHIBITS OR RESTRICTS COMMERCIAL OR BUSINESS
ACTIVITY IN GENERAL BUT DOES NOT EXPRESSLY APPLY TO NO–IMPACT
HOME–BASED BUSINESS, MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT OR RESTRICT
no–impact home–based businesses[; or
(ii) Use of the roads, sidewalks, and other common areas of the
homeowners association by users of the family child care home].
(2) Subject to the provisions of [subsections] SUBSECTION (d) [and (e)(1)]
of this section, the operation of a family child care home, LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME, or no–impact home–based business shall be:
(i) Considered a residential activity; and
(ii) A permitted activity.
(3) A RECORDED COVENANT OR RESTRICTION, A PROVISION IN A
DECLARATION, OR A PROVISION OF THE BYLAWS OR RULES OF A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION MAY NOT LIMIT THE NUMBER OF CHILDREN FOR WHICH A FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME OR LARGE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME PROVIDES FAMILY CHILD
CARE TO BELOW THE NUMBER AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
EDUCATION.
(d) (1) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph and
subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, a homeowners
association may include in its declaration, bylaws, or recorded covenants and restrictions a
provision expressly prohibiting the use of a residence as a [family child care home or]
no–impact home–based business.
(ii) [A homeowners association may not include a provision
described under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph expressly prohibiting the use of a
residence as a family child care home in its declaration, bylaws, or recorded covenants and
restrictions until the lot owners, other than the developer, have 90% of the votes in the
homeowners association.
(iii)] A provision described under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph
expressly prohibiting the use of a residence as a [family child care home or] no–impact
home–based business shall apply to an existing [family child care home or] no–impact
home–based business in the homeowners association.
(2) A provision described under paragraph (1)(i) of this subsection
expressly prohibiting the use of a residence as a [family child care home or] no–impact
home–based business may not be enforced unless it is approved by a simple majority of the
– 13 –

Ch. 375 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
total eligible voters of the homeowners association, not including the developer, under the
voting procedures contained in the declaration or bylaws of the homeowners association.
(3) If a homeowners association includes in its declaration, bylaws, or
recorded covenants and restrictions a provision prohibiting the use of a residence as a
[family child care home or] no–impact home–based business, it shall also include a
provision stating that the prohibition may be eliminated and [family child care homes or]
no–impact home–based businesses may be approved by a simple majority of the total
eligible voters of the homeowners association under the voting procedures contained in the
declaration or bylaws of the homeowners association.
(4) If a homeowners association includes in its declaration, bylaws, or
recorded covenants and restrictions a provision expressly prohibiting the use of a residence
as a [family child care home or] no–impact home–based business, the prohibition may be
eliminated and [family child care or] no–impact home–based business activities may be
permitted by the approval of a simple majority of the total eligible voters of the homeowners
association under the voting procedures contained in the declaration or bylaws of the
homeowners association.
(e) A homeowners association may include in its declaration, bylaws, rules, or
recorded covenants and restrictions a provision that:
(1) Requires FAMILY child care providers to pay on a pro rata basis based
on the total number of family child care homes operating in the homeowners association
any increase in insurance costs of the homeowners association that are solely and directly
attributable to the operation of family child care homes in the homeowners association; and
(2) Imposes a fee for use of common areas in a reasonable amount not to
exceed $50 per year on each family child care home or no–impact home–based business
which is registered and operating in the homeowners association.
(f) (1) [If the homeowners association regulates the number or percentage of
family child care homes under subsection (e)(1) of this section, in order to assure compliance
with this regulation, the] THE homeowners association may require residents to notify the
homeowners association before opening a family child care home OR LARGE FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME.
(2) The homeowners association may require residents to notify the
homeowners association before opening a no–impact home–based business.
(g) (1) A FAMILY child care provider in a homeowners association:
(i) Shall obtain the liability insurance described under §§ 19–106
and 19–203 of the Insurance Article in at least the minimum amount described under that
statute; and
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 375
(ii) May not operate without the liability insurance described under
item (i) of this paragraph.
(2) A homeowners association may not require a FAMILY child care
provider to obtain insurance in an amount greater than the minimum amount required
under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(h) A homeowners association may restrict or prohibit a no–impact home–based
business in any common areas.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 15 –